North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-01.2 Trauma and Emergency Medical System

23-01.2-01.
Trauma system established — Duties of health council.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The health council, in conjunction with the state department of health, may establish and maintain a comprehensive trauma system for the state. The trauma system may include standards for the following components:

A system plan.

Prehospital emergency medical services.

Hospitals, for which the standards must include:

Standards for designation, redesignation, and dedesignation of trauma centers.

Standards for evaluation and quality improvement programs for designated trauma centers. The standards must require each trauma center to collect quality improvement data and to provide specified portions to the department for use in state and regional trauma quality improvement programs.

Qualifications for trauma center personnel.

A trauma registry. Data in the trauma registry is not subject to subpoena or discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action. Designated trauma centers must participate in the trauma registry. A hospital not designated as a trauma center must provide to the registry a minimum set of data elements for all trauma patients as determined by the health council.

A trauma quality improvement program to monitor the performance of the trauma system. The proceedings and records of the program are not subject to subpoena or discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action arising out of any matter that is the subject of consideration by the program.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 250, § 1.

23-01.2-01.
Trauma system established — Duties of health council.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The health council, in conjunction with the department of health and human services, may establish and maintain a comprehensive trauma system for the state. The trauma system may include standards for the following components:

A system plan.

Prehospital emergency medical services.

Hospitals, for which the standards must include:

Standards for designation, redesignation, and dedesignation of trauma centers.

Standards for evaluation and quality improvement programs for designated trauma centers. The standards must require each trauma center to collect quality improvement data and to provide specified portions to the department for use in state and regional trauma quality improvement programs.

Qualifications for trauma center personnel.

A trauma registry. Data in the trauma registry is not subject to subpoena or discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action. Designated trauma centers must participate in the trauma registry. A hospital not designated as a trauma center must provide to the registry a minimum set of data elements for all trauma patients as determined by the health council.

A trauma quality improvement program to monitor the performance of the trauma system. The proceedings and records of the program are not subject to subpoena or discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action arising out of any matter that is the subject of consideration by the program.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 250, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 136, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01.2-02.
Physician immunity for voluntary medical direction.

A physician is immune from liability while providing voluntary medical direction.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 250, § 2.

23-01.2-03.
Trauma center designation.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

Effective January 1, 2011, a hospital that offers emergency services to the public shall meet trauma center designation standards and participate in the trauma system.

The state health council shall adopt rules that allow provisional trauma designation status for a hospital that is partially compliant with trauma designation standards. When issuing a provisional trauma designation, the state health council shall allow a reasonable amount of time, determined by the department, for a hospital to fully meet all trauma designation standards.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 214, § 1.

23-01.2-03.
Trauma center designation.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

Effective January 1, 2011, a hospital that offers emergency services to the public shall meet trauma center designation standards and participate in the trauma system.

The department of health and human services shall adopt rules that allow provisional trauma designation status for a hospital that is partially compliant with trauma designation standards. When issuing a provisional trauma designation, the state health council shall allow a reasonable amount of time, determined by the department, for a hospital to fully meet all trauma designation standards.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 214, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 137, effective September 1, 2022.

23-01.2-04.
Medical director.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state health officer shall appoint an emergency medical services and trauma medical director to provide medical oversight and consultation in the development and administration of the state emergency medical services and trauma systems. The medical director must be a physician licensed in the state and must be contracted and paid by the state department of health.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 180, § 1; 2013, ch. 208, § 1.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2011.

23-01.2-04.
Medical director.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The executive director of the department of health and human services or designee shall appoint an emergency medical services and trauma medical director to provide medical oversight and consultation in the development and administration of the state emergency medical services and trauma systems. The medical director must be a physician licensed in the state and must be contracted and paid by the department of health and human services.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 180, § 1; 2013, ch. 208, § 1; 2021, ch. 352, § 138, effective September 1, 2022.